Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 7 Lobsters and Other Crustaceans

20-7-1.
License required for taking of lobsters.

No person, either as principal, agent, or servant, shall, at any time, catch or take any lobster from any of the waters in the jurisdiction of this state, or place, set, keep, maintain, supervise, lift, raise, or draw in or from any of those waters, or cause to be placed, set, kept, maintained, supervised, lifted, raised, or drawn in or from any of those waters, any pot or other contrivance, designed or adapted for the catching or taking of lobsters, unless licensed to do so.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-7-2.
Taking of lobsters by commercial fishing vessels.

No operator of a Rhode Island-registered boat engaged in trawling for finfish in Rhode Island territorial waters may retain and sell any lobsters taken, unless that operator has a commercial lobster license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-7-3.
Noncommercial lobster licenses.

A holder of a noncommercial lobster license may set, place, or maintain in the water at any one time not more than five (5) lobster pots or traps. A noncommercial lobster licensee shall not offer for sale or sell lobsters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-7-4.
Diver’s lobster license.

A holder of a diver’s license shall take no more than eight (8) lobsters in any one day. It shall be unlawful for any diver to use a spear, gig, gaff, or other penetrating device to harvest lobsters or, while diving, to set, open, or tend lobster pots. It shall be unlawful for lobsters taken by divers to be sold or offered for sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-7-5.
Seller’s license.

Any person having charge of a vessel carrying lobsters who lands in the state of Rhode Island and who is not licensed under any of the provisions of this chapter shall be required to have a seller’s license. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-7-5.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 5; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 8, effective July 6, 2021.

20-7-6.
Use of license by agent or employee.

If any person to whom a seller’s or a commercial lobster license is granted becomes incapacitated for any reason from using that license, that person may permit his or her agent or employee, if a citizen or legal resident of the United States, to perform those duties under the license that may be necessary during the period of the licensee’s incapacity; provided that the incapacitated licensee has notified the director of environmental management prior to the transfer of those duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 164, § 7.

20-7-7.
Suspension and revocation of licenses.

If a person licensed under this chapter is convicted of any of the following offenses, his or her license shall be suspended for the following periods:

Possession of ten (10) or more undersize lobsters, but not more than nineteen (19), in violation of §

20-7-10

, one month;

Possession of twenty (20) or more undersize lobsters, in violation of §

20-7-10

, one year;

Possession of mutilated lobsters or lobster meat, in violation of §

20-7-14

, one year;

Possession of one or more brushed female berried lobsters, in violation of § 20-7-10, one year;

Possession of ten (10) or more egg-bearing female lobsters, in violation of § 20-7-10, one year;

Unauthorized raising of another’s lobster pots, in violation of §

20-4-8

, one year;

Use or possession of a lobster pot from which the markings or branded numbers have been removed, altered, or obliterated, in violation of §

20-7-12

, one year; and

Failure to file reports of lobsters taken, as required by §

20-7-9

, one year.

Any person whose license is so suspended shall not engage in the lobster fishery of this state during the specified period of suspension. Any person who is convicted of engaging in the lobster fishery during the specified period of suspension shall be fined five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisoned for thirty (30) days, or both. The license of any person convicted a second time of any of the offenses set forth in subsection (a) shall be revoked for three (3) years and the person whose license is revoked shall not engage in the lobster fishery of this state in any way while the revocation is in force, under a penalty of sixty (60) days’ imprisonment or a fine of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both, for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 254, § 4.

20-7-7.1.
Administrative suspension/revocation of licenses — Penalties — Appeal.

If a person licensed under this chapter is found, pursuant to §

42-17.1-2

, to have violated any of the following offenses, his or her license shall be suspended for the following periods:

Possession of ten (10) or more undersize lobsters, but not more than nineteen (19), in violation of §

20-7-10

, one month;

Possession of twenty (20) or more undersize lobsters, in violation of §

20-7-10

, one year;

Possession of mutilated lobsters or lobster meat, in violation of §

20-7-14

, one year;

Possession of one or more brushed female berried lobsters, in violation of § 20-7-10, one year;

Possession of ten (10) or more egg-bearing female lobsters, in violation of § 20-7-10, one year;

Unauthorized raising of another’s lobster pots, in violation of §

20-4-8

, one year;

Use or possession of a lobster pot from which the markings or branded numbers have been removed, altered, or obliterated, in violation of §

20-7-12

, one year; and

Failure to file reports of lobsters taken, as required by §

20-7-9

, one year.

Any person whose license is so suspended shall not engage in the lobster fishery in this state during the specified period of suspension. Any person who is found, pursuant to §

42-17.1-2

, to have engaged in the lobster fishery during the specified period of suspension shall pay an administrative penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

The license of any person found, pursuant to §

42-17.1-2

, to have violated any of the offenses set forth in subsection (a) a second time shall be revoked for three (3) years and the person whose license is revoked shall not engage in the lobster fishery of this state in any way while the revocation is in force, and in addition shall pay an administrative penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

In addition to any other sanctions provided by law, any person found, pursuant to §

42-17.1-2

, to have violated any of the provisions of this chapter shall pay an administrative penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), for each lobster taken or possessed in violation of the provisions of this chapter.

Any person aggrieved by a final decision under this section may appeal the decision in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 254, § 5.

20-7-8.
Exhibition of certificate.

Each person or agent, as defined in §

20-7-1

, licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall, upon demand of the director of the department of environmental management or any of the director’s deputies, exhibit the license issued to him or her as provided in §

20-7-1

. Every person violating the provisions of this section shall, for each offense, be fined up to fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-7-9.
Report of lobsters taken.

For the purpose of determining whether the number of lobsters caught in the waters of this state are increasing or decreasing during any period, every person licensed pursuant to §

20-2-24

to catch, take, and/or sell lobsters in Rhode Island shall, upon request of the department of environmental management, report catch and effort statistics upon forms furnished by the department. The returns from any person shall not be made public; shall be kept only in the files of the department; and shall be used only for statistical purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-7-10.
Minimum size of lobsters taken — Egg-bearing females.

Unless otherwise specified by regulations adopted by the marine fisheries council, no person shall catch or take from any of the waters within the jurisdiction of this state, or have in his or her possession within this state, any lobster, or parts of lobsters, cooked or uncooked, that is less than three and three sixteenths inches (33/16") measured from the rear of the eye socket along a line parallel to the center line of the body shell to the rear end of the carapace.

The minimum size of three and three sixteenths inches (33/16") shall be increased as follows:

On January 1, 1988, 1/32" from 33/16" to 37/32";

On January 1, 1989, 1/32" from 37/32" to 31/4";

On January 1, 1991, 1/32" from 31/4" to 39/32";

On January 1, 1992, 1/32" from 39/32" to 35/16".

No person shall have in his or her possession within this state any female lobster bearing eggs or from which the eggs have been brushed or removed.

In addition to any penalties specified in other sections of this chapter, every person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each lobster in violation of this regulation or be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both. Any person licensed under this chapter catching and taking any lobster as described in subsection (a) or (b), and immediately returning the lobster alive to the water from which it was taken, shall not be subject to these fines or penalties. The possession of any lobster as described in subsection (a) or (b), cooked or uncooked, shall be prima facie evidence that the lobster was caught and taken in violation of this section. Any person convicted a second time of a violation of this section shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) and be deprived of the privilege of fishing for lobsters within the state for three (3) years, after conviction, under a penalty of sixty (60) days’ imprisonment or a fine of five hundred dollars ($500), or both, for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 305, § 1.

20-7-11.
Buoying of pots — Escape vents.

Each and every lobster pot, set, kept, or maintained, or caused to be set, kept, or maintained, in any of the waters in the jurisdiction of this state by any person licensed under this chapter, shall contain an escape vent in accordance with the following specifications:

A rectangular escape vent with an unobstructed opening not less than 13/4 inches (44.5mm) by 6 inches (152.5mm); or

Two (2) circular escape vents with an unobstructed opening not less than 21/4 inches (57.2mm) in diameter; or

An unobstructed gap caused by raising both ends of a bottom lath in the parlor section 11/4 inches (44.5mm) from the bottom; or

An unobstructed gap caused by separating both ends of two (2) vertical laths on the end of the parlor section by 13/4 inches (44.5mm); or

An unobstructed gap created by cutting wires in a wire trap in such a manner as to meet the minimum size and number of vents required under subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2).

The vent or gap shall be installed or made in the parlor section on the sides or end panel. No horizontal rectangular vent or gap or circular vent shall be located more than three inches (3") from the sill of the trap. Traps equipped with multiple opposing parlor sections must adhere to the escape vent requirements specified in subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2) in each parlor section. Any fisher not complying with the provisions of this section or §

20-7-10

shall be fined in compliance with §

20-3-3

.

The marine fisheries council shall have the power to establish larger escape vent sizes by regulation.

Each lobster pot shall be separately and plainly buoyed; except that in cases where natural conditions render it impracticable to separately buoy each pot, the director of environmental management may, upon application from any person licensed under this chapter, grant permission to otherwise buoy those pots subject to rules and regulations promulgated by the director; and each and every permit so granted shall set forth the name of the person to whom the permit is granted; the number of the permit; the place or places where the lobster pots are to be located; the manner in which lobster pots shall be set; and the period of time during which the permit shall extend.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 305, § 1.

20-7-11.1.
Lobster pots — Tagging — Advisory committee.

Each and every pot, trap, or other device used for the taking of lobsters or crabs in any of the waters of this state shall bear a color scheme on the attached buoy. Each applicant for a lobster license shall state the color scheme that he or she desires to use. These colors, unless disapproved by the director of environmental management, shall be stated in the license, and all buoys used by the licensee shall be marked accordingly. Each licensee shall cause his or her color scheme to be displayed on any lobster boat used by the licensee in the waters of this state. Those colors shall be painted on the port and starboard sides of the hull in a section not less than one foot (1´) square, or a clearly painted buoy shall be set at the highest point on the boat excluding the mast and be visible for three hundred sixty degrees (360 degrees). The buoy or colors must be prominently displayed on the vessel at all times that lobster gear fished under that license is in the water.

No person shall place, set, lift, raise, unduly disturb, draw in, or transfer any pot, trap, or other device used for the taking of lobsters unless the color scheme of the attached buoy is the same as the color scheme that is on file with the license application and displayed on the boat used by that person, or unless that person is duly licensed and possesses written permission from the rightful owner of the pot, trap, or other device.

The Rhode Island marine fisheries council has the authority to promulgate regulations requiring the tagging of lobster traps. The director of the department of environmental management is authorized to promulgate regulations that establish a fee for official state lobster trap tags. Any fee collected by the department will be retained by the agency, subject to §

20-2-28.2

, to be used for the exclusive purpose of producing and distributing the trap tags and, if necessary, supporting other lobster fishery management measures, including enforcement of the trap tag program; provided, however, that: (1) The department shall not establish a fee to cover any cost other than the cost of trap tags without first obtaining a recommendation from an advisory committee in accordance with subsection (d); and (2) The department shall report to the general assembly regarding the need for the fee to cover any additional cost in accordance with subsection (d).

The department shall create an advisory committee composed of five (5) members of the lobster industry that utilize trap tags. The director, or his or her designee, will serve on the committee and act as chairperson. The committee will formulate recommendations on the expenditure of the funds derived from the tagging program. The department shall prepare an annual report for submittal to the general assembly that summarizes the status of the lobster management and trap tag program, management actions, program needs, and catch and effort data, and that provides an itemized listing of all program expenses. This report shall be available to the public and provided to each commercial fishing organization in the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 10, § 1.

20-7-12.
Removal of branded numbers from lobster pots.

No person shall set, maintain, or have in his or her possession any lobster pots from which the branded numbers have been altered, obliterated, or removed with the intent to defraud or deprive the owner. Every person convicted of violating the provision of this section shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for each of these traps or be imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or both. All pots used or possessed contrary to the provisions of this section and other sections of this chapter shall be seized by any officer engaged in the enforcement of this chapter and that property shall be forfeited.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-7-12.1.
Unauthorized possession and/or transfer of pots and traps.

No person except the director of environmental management, enforcement officers, and authorized technical personnel of the department of environmental management shall place, set, keep, maintain, sell, transfer, or have in his or her possession, any pot, trap, car, or any other device used in taking or holding lobster or crabs, nor take, remove, or carry away from the beach or shore any pot, trap, car, or other device or line (warp) or buoy without the written permission of the their owner.

Every person convicted of violating this section shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense, or be imprisoned not exceeding one year, or both, and each pot, trap, car, or device used in violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense. In addition, if that person is licensed, his or her license shall be revoked for one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 204, § 2.

20-7-13.
Raising pots at night.

No person shall raise or unduly disturb any lobster pot or trap within the territorial waters of this state between the hours of one hour after sundown and one hour before sunrise. Every person violating this section shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or be imprisoned not exceeding one year, or both. However in situations of emergency upon application being made, the owner of the lobster pots or traps may be authorized to remove the pots or traps by the director of environmental management, or the director’s designee, during the prohibited hours. All boats, pots, or other equipment used in violation of this section shall be seized and forfeited to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 6.

20-7-14.
Mutilation of uncooked lobsters.

No person shall mutilate any uncooked lobster by severing its tail from its body, or have in his or her possession any part, or parts, of any uncooked lobster so mutilated. In any and all prosecutions under this section, the possession of any part, or parts, of any uncooked lobster so mutilated shall be prima facie evidence sufficient to convict.

The director of environmental management is authorized to promulgate regulations exempting land-based processing facilities from the provisions of this chapter. Those regulations shall prescribe the procedures to apply for the subject exemption permit and the standards to be employed by the director in his or her consideration of the application. Those regulations shall prescribe rules governing the conduct and operation of the facility and may include restrictions on product forms, sizes, possession requirements, and other provisions in order to maintain the protection of the lobster resource and enforcement of the provision of this chapter.

Any fishing vessel operating in Rhode Island territorial waters shall not have on board at any time more than one pound of cooked or uncooked lobster meat for each person on board that vessel. Any violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), and imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 276, § 1.

20-7-15.
Methods of taking blue crabs — Nonresidents.

Unless otherwise specified by regulation of the marine fisheries council, no person shall take, or attempt to take, any blue crabs from any of the waters in this state except by a scoop or crab net, trot, or land line. Taking of blue crabs shall be restricted to residents of this state. No person shall take blue crabs from the waters of the state between the hours of sunset and sunrise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-7-16.
Egg-bearing blue crabs — Minimum size.

No person shall take, offer for sale, or possess at any time any female blue crab bearing eggs visible thereon, or from which the egg pouch or bunion has been removed. Unless otherwise specified by regulation of the marine fisheries council, no person shall take, buy, sell, give away, expose for sale, or possess any blue crab measuring less than four and one eighth inches (41/8“) across the shell from tip to tip of spike.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-7-17.
Violations as to blue crabs.

Any person violating any of the provisions of §§

20-7-15

and

20-7-16

shall be fined up to fifty dollars ($50.00) and costs for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.